Utah statutes.
17-43-309.   Local mental health advisory councils -- Powers and responsibilities.

(1)  A county legislative body may, separately or in conjunction with one or more other counties, establish a local mental health advisory council.

(2)  Mental health advisory council members shall be appointed by their respective county legislative bodies.  Initially one-fourth of the members shall be appointed for one year, one-fourth for two years, one-fourth for three years, and one-fourth for four years.  After the initial appointment, the term of each member shall be for four years.  Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as for unexpired terms.  Council members may be removed for cause.

(3)  Each mental health advisory council shall be responsible and advisory to local mental health authorities in planning, organizing, and operating community mental health programs.

(4)  Council members shall be selected from persons representative of interested groups in the community, including, if possible:

(a)  an officer or employee of the school district within the city or county;

(b)  one or more persons familiar with problems in mental health, as these are involved in proceedings in criminal, domestic, or juvenile courts;

(c)  one or more members of voluntary health, welfare, or mental health associations or agencies;

(d)  a member of the legislative body of each participating county; and

(e)  at least one person licensed in this state to practice medicine and surgery in all their branches and engaged in the private practice of medicine.

(5)  Council members may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties, from funds made available to local mental health authorities.

(6)  Each mental health advisory council shall be an agent of the local mental health authority, and is subject to laws and requirements relating to the local mental health authority.



Amended by Chapter 80, 2004 General Session

